District of Columbia statutes.
16-525

Condemnation and sale of property; proceeds of sale under interlocutory order.

In any form of action, where specific property has been attached and remains under the control of the court, judgment of condemnation of the property shall be entered, and as much thereof as may be necessary to satisfy the demand of the plaintiff shall be sold under fieri facias. If the property was sold under interlocutory order of the court, the proceeds, or as much thereof as may be necessary, shall be applied to the plaintiff’s claim by order of the court.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 550, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
This section is referenced in § 16-524 and § 16-527.
1981 Ed., § 16-525.
1973 Ed., § 16-525.